Illinois, session 104th, HB2652.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Substance Use Disorder Act is amended by 5adding Section 15-50 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 301/15-50 new)7    Sec. 15-50. Substance abuse treatment and intervention 8services; licensing restriction. Beginning on and after the 9effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 10Assembly, the Department of Human Services shall not approve 11any initial or renewal application for the licensure of a 12facility where substance use treatment or intervention 13services will be provided within 1,000 feet of: 14        (i) any building or buildings or real property 15    comprising a public or private elementary or secondary 16    school, community college, college, or university, 17    including any adjacent school yard, school playing field, 18    or school playground;19        (ii) a public playground; or20        (iii) any public park building or real property 21    comprising any public park. 22    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to invalidate 23any initial or renewal application for licensure approved   HB2652- 2 -LRB104 08665 KTG 18719 b1prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 2General Assembly. 3    As used in this Section: 4        "Public playground" means a piece of land owned or 5    controlled by a unit of local government that is 6    designated by the unit of local government for use solely 7    or primarily for children's recreation. 8        "Public park" includes a park, forest preserve, 9    bikeway, trail, or conservation area under the 10    jurisdiction of the State or a unit of local government.